Hawaii statutes.
§342G-115 Reverse vending machine
requirements. Reverse vending machines may be used by redemption centers
to satisfy the requirements of section 342G-113. Reverse vending machines
shall accept any type of empty deposit beverage container and pay out the full
refund value in either cash or a redeemable voucher for those containers that
bear a valid Hawaii refund value. If the reverse vending machine is unable to
read the barcode then the reverse vending machine shall reject the container.
The reverse vending machine shall be routinely serviced to ensure proper
operation and continuous acceptance of empty deposit beverage containers and
payment of the refund value. [L 2002, c 176, pt of §2; am L 2004, c 241, §9; am
L 2005, c 206, §4; ree L 2007, c 285, §8]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next